Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
PART 3 Georgia Data Analytic Center

Effective date. —

This part became effective July 1, 2019.

Editor’s notes.

Former Part 3, relating to planning, developing, and managing energy resources, and the Office of Energy Resources, and consisting of Code Sections

45-12-150

through

45-12-155

, was repealed by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1108, effective July 1, 1994. The former Code sections were based on Ga. L. 1976, p. 1740, §§ 1, 5, 6, 7; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1536, §§ 1, 2; Code 1981, §

45-12-150

; Code 1981, §§

45-12-151

through

45-12-155

, as redesignated from Code 1981, §§

45-12-154

through 45-12-158, respectively, by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1539, § 3; and Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45. For provisions concerning the Division of Energy Resources, see Code Sections

50-23-30

through

50-23-35

.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1539, effective April 1, 1983, in addition to redesignating former Code Sections

45-12-154

through 45-12-158 as

45-12-151

through

45-12-155

, respectively, and amending them, also reenacted §

45-12-150

without change and repealed former §§

45-12-151

through

45-12-153

, concerning the creation, composition and powers and duties of the Georgia Council for Energy Resources.

45-12-150.
Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

“Aggregated data” means information that has been combined into groups showing averages or other summary statistics and that is not individually identifiable information.

“De-identified data” means information that does not identify an individual, for which there is no reasonable basis to believe that the information can be used to identify an individual, and that meets the requirements for de-identification of protected health information as defined under HIPAA.

“GDAC Project” means the Georgia Data Analytic Center established pursuant to this part.

“Health data” means information that is created or received by a state agency or department that relates to the past, present, or future physical or mental health or condition of an individual or the past, present, or future payment for the provision of health care services to an individual.

“HIPAA” means the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, P.L. 104-191, and any regulations promulgated thereunder by the United States secretary of health and human services.

“Individually identifiable information” means information that identifies an individual or for which there is a reasonable basis to believe that the information can be used to identify an individual.

“IRB” means an institutional review board designated by the office and established pursuant to federal regulations (45 C.F.R. Section 46) with a nation-wide assurance for the protection of human subjects approved by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Office for Human Research Protections, to review and monitor research involving human subjects to ensure that such subjects are protected from harm and that the rights of such subjects are adequately protected.

“Office” means the Office of Planning and Budget.

“Protected health information” has the same meaning as provided for under HIPAA in effect as of July 1, 2019.

“Research” means a systematic investigation, including research development, testing, and evaluation, which is designed to develop or contribute to generalizable knowledge as defined pursuant to 45 C.F.R. Section 46.102(d).

“Researcher” means a public or private entity that conducts research under the review and monitoring of an IRB and has received approval from the data steward for the purpose of requested data elements.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-12-150

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 507, § 1/HB 197.

45-12-151.
Capabilities and operation of Georgia Data Analytic Center; procurement of technology and services; disclosure of individual identifiable data.

No later than September 1, 2019, the office shall establish an operational Georgia Data Analytic Center capable of securely receiving, maintaining, and transmitting data in accordance with this part and with the HIPAA privacy and security standards applicable to this part. The office may employ staff to assist with carrying out the functions associated with the establishment and maintenance of the GDAC Project.

The office shall ensure the procurement of hardware, software, and a data base system capable of performing analytics at scale and capable of evaluating all data to the extent required to carry out the purposes of the GDAC Project pursuant to this part. Further, the office shall procure sufficient management services to develop and maintain the system.

Notwithstanding any provision of this part to the contrary, the GDAC Project shall seek to receive and maintain individually identifiable data but transmit de-identified data wherever possible and shall only receive, maintain, and transmit individually identifiable information if permitted by this Code section and other applicable law and if the information is in a form and format that are secured to prevent disclosure of individually identifiable information.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-12-151

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 507, § 1/HB 197.

45-12-152.
Oversight.

Oversight of the operation of the GDAC Project established pursuant to this part shall be vested in the office. The GDAC Project shall receive, maintain, and transmit data only as permitted by this part and as approved by the office and the state agency or department whose data are requested. The office’s responsibilities with respect to this part shall include:

Identification of data that have been created, received, or maintained by state agencies or departments that may be appropriate for receipt, maintenance, and transmission by the GDAC Project in furtherance of the purposes of this part;

Prior to the receipt of data by the GDAC Project, review and approval of the appropriateness of such receipt, including consideration of the following factors:

Whether the transmitting agency or department has authority to collect the data proposed to be received by the GDAC Project, particularly if the data include individually identifiable information;

Whether collection of the data proposed to be received by the GDAC Project is expected to further the purposes of this part, namely, the improvement of public health and the safety, security, and well-being of Georgia residents; and

Whether reasonable efforts have been made to ensure that the GDAC Project will receive only the appropriate data needed to accomplish the purposes of this part;

Prior to the receipt or transmission of data by the GDAC Project, review and approval of any necessary data use agreements or business associate agreements with any person or entity from which or to which information is received or transmitted in compliance with all applicable privacy and security standards, including, but not limited to, HIPAA, when such data include individually identifiable information that is protected health information;

Adopting and publishing policies and procedures for the efficient and transparent operation of the GDAC Project, including, but not limited to, the following:

Privacy and data security policies and procedures that comply with the applicable federal and state privacy and security statutes and regulations, including HIPAA;

Data access policies and procedures that allow access by a public or private entity, including a researcher, only when such access request meets the standards set forth in the data access policies and procedures and has been approved by the office and the appropriate state agency or department. When data access is requested by any public or private entity, including a researcher, for the purpose of conducting research, the office shall only approve access to data after review and approval by an IRB, and such access shall be limited to data identified in approved IRB research protocols and only for the period of the approval. In no event shall the office approve access to health data that identifies, or that may be used to identify, rates of payment by a private entity for the provision of health care services to an individual unless the entity seeking access agrees to keep such information confidential and to prevent public disclosure of such data or the rates of payment derived from such data;

Data retention policies requiring that data be returned to transmitting state agencies or departments or destroyed when it is no longer in the state’s interest to promote analysis of such data and in accordance with applicable HIPAA regulations, data use agreements, and provisions of IRB approvals;

Policies to require researchers to consult with subject matter experts in the data sets being linked on a specific project. The purpose of such consultation shall be to help researchers understand and interpret the data being linked to a specific project; and

Policies that establish processes to engage researchers and academic institutions across Georgia to help set research priorities and promote the use of the GDAC Project to accelerate population health research in this state;

Communicating to all state agencies and departments that each state agency or department shall, upon request of the office, make available to the office through the GDAC Project all data housed within its respective office pursuant to policies established pursuant to this Code section;

Establishing the process by which each state agency or department is required, in consultation with the office, to identify and submit to the office a minimum of two distinct policy concerns that may be studied in an integrated information environment in order to identify evidence based solutions to such policy concerns; and

Establishing procedures for ranking the submission and selection of such policy concerns considered by the office to be of greatest concern to the health, safety, security, and well-being of Georgia’s citizens; and

Establishing a process to set research priorities that utilize the GDAC Project to provide effective and efficient policy management for the state.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-12-152

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 507, § 1/HB 197.

45-12-153.
Access to data.

Any state agency or department that creates, receives, or maintains publicly supported program, fiscal, or health data shall, only after execution of an enforceable data use, data sharing, or other similar agreement that is acceptable to the state agency or department, transmit or allow access to such data as is necessary and appropriate to further the purposes of this part and shall cooperate with GDAC Project requests for receipt of or access to such data. Notwithstanding the foregoing, any state agency or department shall not be required to transmit data which it creates, receives, or maintains to the GDAC Project or to allow access to such data if the Attorney General’s review or the applicable state agency’s or department’s review determines that such transmission or access would violate state or federal law. The Attorney General’s review shall include consideration of an analysis from the state agency or department whose data are being requested.

This Code section shall not prohibit the office or any agency or department from creating, receiving, maintaining, or transmitting data in data systems that are separate and distinct from the GDAC Project.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-12-153

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 507, § 1/HB 197.

45-12-154.
Reporting to General Assembly.

No later than July 1, 2020, upon the receipt of data by the GDAC Project pursuant to this part, and on an annual basis thereafter, the office shall publish a report that is made available and accessible to the General Assembly consisting of:

A description of the implementation of the GDAC Project, including identification of the sources and types of data received and maintained by the GDAC Project over the prior 12 months;

A list of all aggregated data maintained by the GDAC Project;

A description of each IRB approved disclosure of data or data sets by the GDAC Project;

A list of publications and other reports based on GDAC Project data;

A strategic plan for achieving the purposes of this part during the successive 12 month period; and

Any other information deemed appropriate by the office.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-12-154

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 507, § 1/HB 197.

45-12-154.1.
Annual unified reports on violations of mental health parity laws.

The administrator of the GDAC Project shall prepare an annual unified report regarding complaints filed for suspected violations of mental health parity laws. Such annual unified report shall comprise data received from the Department of Insurance pursuant to subsection (g) of Code Section 33-1-27 and data received from the Department of Community Health pursuant to subsection (g) of Code Section 33-21A-13. Such annual unified report shall be completed and made publicly available beginning April 1, 2024, and annually thereafter.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-12-154.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 26, § 6-4/HB 1013.

Effective date.

This Code section became effective July 1, 2022.

45-12-155.
Funding sources.

The office may apply for and receive funding in relation to the GDAC Project from the following sources:

Grants from research or other private entities;

Fees paid by persons or entities requesting access to GDAC Project data or the performance of analyses by the GDAC Project, which fees have been approved by the office to support the cost of preparing data for access or performing analyses;

Federal grants;

Grants or other financial assistance from state or local departments, agencies, authorities, and organizations at the discretion of such entities, for specific projects of interest to such entities; and

Appropriations made to the GDAC Project pursuant to the General Appropriations Act or a supplementary appropriations Act.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-12-155

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 507, § 1/HB 197.